California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The State Council on Developmental Disabilities may review and evaluate existing and proposed community living arrangement programs within the various regions of the state and may make a recommendation to the Director of Developmental Services concerning programs that should be considered as the most appropriate agency to be designated as responsible for the implementation of the community living continuum within their area. These programs shall include, but not be limited to, those that have been funded through the issuance of Mental Retardation Private Institutions’ Fund grants, state council program development grants, and model state hospital programs. Consideration shall be given to all of the following:

(1) Private nonprofit corporations.

(2) Public agencies.

(3) A joint powers agreement agency.

(b) At least one-third of the board of directors, public or private, or an advisory committee in the event a public agency is selected, shall be composed of consumer representatives, including members of the immediate family of the consumer.

(c) A person shall not serve as a director or advisory committee member who has a financial interest, as defined in Section 87103 of the Government Code, in designated agency operations, except with respect to any interest as a consumer of a designated agency or regional center services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 60.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4833.

Upon designation by the Department of Developmental Services pursuant to Section 4831, the designated agency established pursuant to Section 4832 shall:

(a) Design, organize and/or provide services for persons in local communities. 

(b) Seek and utilize funds from all available resources.

(c) Assure that all programs within the community living continuum shall provide all employees with competency-based, pre- and in-service training, which is coordinated with appropriate, public education agencies.

(d) Establish public support and acceptance for community development with full integration of individuals with developmental special needs.

The community living continuums shall be based upon the principle of normalization and shall include provisions for, but not be limited to, individual choice of living in home, in various types of apartments, small group dwellings, or condominiums. The department and these programs shall assure that services are provided in, or as close to, a person’s home community as feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

4834.

The Director of the Department of Developmental Services may contract with a designated agency, pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

4835.

(a) The Director of Developmental Services may establish uniform operational procedures, performance and evaluation standards, and utilization criteria for designated agencies pursuant to this chapter.

(b) These standards and criteria shall be developed with participation by consumer organizations, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the Association of Regional Center Agencies, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Education, and the Department of Rehabilitation, and consultations with individuals with experience in developmental services programming.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 61.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4836.

The director shall prepare a yearly report to the Legislature on the progress and effectiveness of the system using the state evaluation model in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

4837.

The Director of Developmental Services may provide 90-day advance funding to the designated agency or community-based programs for the development or provision of continuum services under the jurisdiction of the department.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any contract entered into by the department with a designated agency pursuant to this chapter may provide for periodic advance payments for services to be performed under such contract. No advance payment made pursuant to this section shall exceed 25 percent of the total annual contract amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

4839.

The State Department of Developmental Services may study and prepare a plan in cooperation with the State Council on Developmental Disabilities. The plan should consider the following:

(a) Necessary technical assistance, training, and evaluation to assure standards of quality and program success.

(b) Maximization of existing state and federal resources available to assist persons with developmental special needs to live in the least restrictive environment possible, including the following:

(1) Federal housing subsidy and assistance.

(2) Supplemental security income.

(3) Local social services.

(4) Local and state health services and related resources.

(c) Procedural standards for designated agencies, including the following:

(1) Program development process.

(2) Training for workers in the developmental services field.

(3) Management information system.

(4) Fiscal accountability and cost benefit control.

(5) Establishment of contractual relationships.

(6) Evaluation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 696.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4841.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 4675, 4676 and 4677, the Director of Developmental Services, when reviewing, approving, and allocating money from the Program Development Fund for community living arrangements, shall give high priority to programs which may be included in a continuum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

4843.

To accomplish the goals enumerated in Section 4833, the director may:

(a) Develop a continuum training model and provide technical assistance to providers of community living arrangements through state and county agencies and regional center professional collaboration.

(b) Establish competency-based training programs.

(c) Centralize and increase the availability and dissemination of information regarding community living arrangements.

(d) Assist the agencies in community living continuums and regional centers in the recruitment of qualified care providers and staff in order to fulfill the increasing need for quality living arrangements and support services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

4844.

The Director of Developmental Services shall initiate and monitor interagency performance agreements between the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Social Services, and the Department of Housing and Community Development to
 ensure planning, coordination, and resource sharing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 78.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4845.

If authorized by regulations adopted by the department and if not available through other state or local programs, the continuum services may with respect to the designated agency, include, but shall not be limited to:

(a) Family subsidy programs.

(b) In-home support services.

(c) Subsidized adoptive and quasi-adoptive foster care services.

(d) Alternative respite services.

(e) Crisis assistance.

(f) Independent and semi-independent living.

(g) Group living for six or fewer persons.

(h) Programs to meet the special needs of individuals who are medically fragile.

(i) Services to persons requiring maximum supervision due to intensive behavioral and severe developmental special needs.

It is not the intent of this section to release any other state or local agency of its program responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

4846.

Interagency agreements shall be established between the regional centers and the community living continuums to assure clear roles and responsibilities for delivery of services; and may include the Department of Rehabilitation Independent Living Programs where applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Habilitation Services For Persons With Developmental Disabilities [4850. - 4867.]

4850.

(a) The Legislature reaffirms its intent that habilitation services for adults with developmental disabilities should be planned and provided as a part of a continuum and that habilitation services should be available to enable persons with developmental disabilities to approximate the pattern of everyday living available to nondisabled people of the same age.

(b) The Legislature further intends that habilitation services shall be provided to adults with
 developmental disabilities as specified in this chapter in order to guarantee the rights stated in Section 4502.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.1.

Notwithstanding Section 19050.9 of the Government Code, beginning July 1, 2004, the State Department of Developmental Services shall succeed to all functions and responsibilities of the Department of Rehabilitation with respect to the administration of the Habilitation Services Program established pursuant to former Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 19350) of Part 2 of Division 10.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.2.

(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided, this chapter shall only apply to those habilitation services purchased by the regional centers.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to abridge the rights stated in Section 4502.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4851.

The definitions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this chapter, with respect to habilitation services provided through the regional center, and unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Habilitation services” means community-based services purchased or provided for adults with developmental disabilities, including services provided under the Work Activity Program and the Supported Employment Program, to prepare and maintain them at their highest level of vocational functioning, or to prepare them for referral to vocational rehabilitation services.

(b) “Individual program plan” means the overall plan developed by a regional center pursuant
 to Section 4646.

(c) “Individual habilitation service plan” means the service plan developed by the habilitation service vendor to meet employment goals in the individual program plan.

(d) “Department” means the State Department of Developmental Services.

(e) “Work activity program” includes, but is not limited to, work activity centers or community-based work activity programs
 vendored by a regional center.

(f) “Certification” means certification procedures developed by the Department of Rehabilitation.

(g) “Work activity program day” means the period of time during which a Work Activity Program provides services to individuals.

(h) “Supported employment program” means a program that meets the requirements of subdivisions (j) to (o), inclusive.

(i) “Individual” means any adult who receives services purchased under this chapter.

(j) “Supported employment” means paid work that is integrated in the community for individuals with developmental disabilities.

(k) “Integrated work” means the engagement of an employee with a disability in work in a setting in the community in which individuals interact with individuals without disabilities other than those who are providing services to those individuals, to the same extent that individuals without disabilities in comparable positions interact with other persons.

(l) “Supported employment placement” means the employment of an individual with a developmental disability by an employer in the community, directly or through contract with a supported employment
 program. This includes provision of ongoing support services necessary for the individual to retain employment.

(m) “Allowable supported employment services” means the services approved in the individual program plan and specified in the individual habilitation service plan for the purpose of achieving supported employment as an outcome, and may include any of the following:

(1) Job development, to the extent authorized by the regional center.

(2) Program staff time for conducting job analysis of supported employment opportunities for a
 specific
 individual.

(3) Program staff time for the direct supervision or training of an individual while they engage in integrated work unless other arrangements for individual supervision, including, but not limited to, employer supervision reimbursed by the supported employment program, are approved by the regional center.

(4) Community-based training in adaptive functional and social skills necessary to ensure job adjustment and
 retention.

(5) Counseling with
 an individual’s significant other to ensure support of an individual in job adjustment.

(6) Advocacy or intervention on behalf of an individual to resolve problems affecting the
 individual’s work adjustment or retention.

(7) Ongoing support services needed to maximize the individual’s retention of the job.

(n) “Group services” means job coaching in a group supported employment placement at a job
 coach-to-individual ratio of not less than 1 to 2 nor more than 1 to 8 where services to a minimum of two
 individuals are funded by the regional center or the Department of Rehabilitation. For individuals receiving group services, job coaching shall be provided at the worksite.

(o) “Individualized services” means job coaching and other supported employment services for regional center-funded
 individuals in a supported employment placement at a job coach-to-individual ratio of 1 to 1, and that decrease over time until stabilization is achieved. Individualized services may be provided on or off the jobsite.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 43.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.

A consumer shall be referred to a provider of habilitation services under this chapter when all of the following apply:

(a) The individual is an adult who has been diagnosed as having a developmental disability.

(b) The individual is determined to be in need of and has chosen habilitation services through the individual program planning process pursuant to Section 4646.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.

(a) When a referral for habilitation services pursuant to Section 4852 has been made and if the individual is placed in a work activity program, he or she shall be deemed presumptively eligible for a period not to exceed 90 days.

(b) During the period of presumptive eligibility, the work activity program shall submit a work skills evaluation report to the regional center. The work skills evaluation report shall reflect the performance of the consumer in
 all of the following areas:

(1) Appropriate behavior to safely conduct himself or herself in a work setting.

(2) Adequate attention span to reach a productivity level in paid work.

(3) Ability to understand and act on simple instructions within a reasonable length of time.

(4) Ability to communicate basic needs and understand basic receptive language.

(5) Attendance level.

(c) During the period of presumptive eligibility, the individual program plan planning team shall, pursuant to Section 4646, utilize the work skills evaluation report to determine the appropriateness of the referral.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.

In developing the individual habilitation service plan pursuant to Section 4853, the habilitation service provider shall develop specific and measurable objectives to determine whether the consumer demonstrates ability to reach or maintain individual employment goals in all of the following areas:

(a) Participation in paid work for a specified period of time.

(b) Obtaining or sustaining a specified productivity
 rate.

(c) Obtaining or sustaining a specified attendance level.

(d) Demonstration of appropriate behavior for a work setting.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.1.

The individual program plan planning team, shall, pursuant to Section 4646, meet, when it is necessary to review any of the following:

(a) The appropriateness of job placement.

(b) The appropriateness of the services available at the Work Activity Program or Supported Employment Program.

(c) The individual habilitation service
 plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4855.

When an individual who is eligible for habilitation services under this chapter is referred to the Department of Rehabilitation for vocational rehabilitation services, including supported employment services, and is placed on a Department of Rehabilitation waiting list for vocational rehabilitation as a result of the Department of Rehabilitation’s order of selection regulations, the regional center shall authorize appropriate services for the individual pursuant to this chapter as needed until services can be provided by the vocational
 rehabilitation program.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4856.

(a) The regional center shall monitor, evaluate, and audit habilitation services providers for program effectiveness, using performance criteria that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Service quality.

(2) Protections for individuals receiving services.

(3) Compliance with applicable service standards established by the department. The department shall, in consultation with regional centers, providers, and other stakeholders,
 establish the service standards no later than September 1, 2027. The service standards shall be designed to promote the provision of quality services that enhance individual outcomes while maintaining compliance with federal requirements. From September 2026 until September 2027, the department shall update the Legislature quarterly on progress toward establishment of the service standards, including any considerations or concerns raised by regional centers, providers, and the community.

(b) (1) The regional center may impose immediate sanctions on providers of work activity programs and supported employment programs for noncompliance with service
 standards contained in regulations adopted by the department, and for safety violations
 that pose a threat to individuals of habilitation services.

(2) Sanctions include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) A moratorium on new referrals.

(B) Imposition of a corrective plan as specified in regulations.

(C) Removal of
 individuals from a service area where dangerous conditions or abusive conditions exist.

(D) Termination of vendorization.

(c) A moratorium on new referrals may be the first formal sanction to be taken except in instances in which individuals are at imminent risk of abuse or other harm. When the regional center determines a moratorium on new referrals to be the first formal sanction, a corrective action plan shall be developed. The moratorium shall be lifted only when the conditions cited are corrected per a corrective action plan.

(d) A corrective action plan is a formal
 sanction, that may be imposed either simultaneously with a moratorium on new referrals, or as a single sanction in circumstances that do not require a moratorium, as determined by the regional center. Noncompliance with the conditions and timelines of the corrective action plan shall result in termination of vendorization.

(e) Removal of individuals from a program shall take place
 only when dangerous or abusive conditions are present, or upon termination of vendorization. In instances of removal for health and safety reasons, when the corrections are made by the program, as determined adequate by the regional center,
 individuals may return, at their option.

(f) A provider sanctioned under subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) may request an administrative
 review, as specified in Section 4648.1.

(g) A provider sanctioned under subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall have a right to a formal review by the Office of Administrative Hearings under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(h) Effective July 1, 2004, if a habilitation services provider is under sanction under former Section 19354.5, the provider shall complete the requirements of the corrective action plan or any other terms or conditions imposed upon it as part of the sanctions. At the end of the term of the corrective action plan or other compliance
 requirements, the services provider shall be evaluated by the regional center based upon the requirements in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 44.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4857.

The regional center shall purchase habilitation services pursuant to the individual program plan. Habilitation services shall continue as long as satisfactory progress is being made toward achieving the objectives of the individual habilitation service plan or as long as these services are determined by the regional center to be necessary to maintain the individual at their highest level of vocational functioning, or to prepare the individual for referral to vocational rehabilitation services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4857.1.

Regional centers may purchase habilitation services only from providers who are vendored as described in Section 4861 and regulations promulgated pursuant to that section. Habilitation services providers who, on July 1, 2004, are providing services to consumers shall be deemed to be an approved vendor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 12, Sec. 12.   (AB 143)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4858.

(a) Each work activity program vendor shall, at a minimum, annually review the status of consumers participating in their program to determine whether these individuals would benefit from vocational rehabilitation services, including supported employment.

(b) If it is determined that the consumer would benefit from vocational rehabilitation services, the work activity program vendor shall, in conjunction with the regional center and in accordance with the
 individual program plan process, refer the consumer to the Department of Rehabilitation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4859.

(a) The department shall adopt regulations to establish rates for work activity program services subject to the approval of the Department of Finance. The regulations shall provide for an equitable and cost-effective ratesetting procedure in which each specific allowable service, activity, and provider administrative cost comprising an overall habilitation service, as determined by the department, reflects the reasonable cost of service. Reasonable costs shall be determined biennially by the department, subject to audit
 at the discretion of the department.

(b) The department shall adopt the existing work activity program rates as of July 1, 2004, that shall remain in effect until the next ratesetting year.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, the regional center shall pay the work activity program rates established by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4860.

(a) (1) The hourly rate for supported employment services shall be set by the department and posted to its internet website.

(2) Job coach hours spent in travel to consumer worksites may be reimbursable for individualized services only when the job coach travels from the vendor’s headquarters to the consumer’s worksite or from one consumer’s worksite to another, and only when the travel is one way.

(b) The hourly rate for group services shall be set by the department and posted to its internet website. Consumers in a group shall be scheduled to start and end work at the same time, unless an exception that takes into consideration the consumer’s compensated work schedule is approved in advance by the regional center. The department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall adopt regulations to define the appropriate grounds for granting these exceptions. When the number of consumers in a supported employment placement group drops to fewer than the minimum required in subdivision (p) of Section 4851, the regional center may terminate funding for the group services in that group, unless, within 90 days, the program provider adds one or more regional centers, or Department of Rehabilitation-funded supported employment consumers to the group.

(c) When Section 4855 applies, fees shall be authorized for the following:

(1) A three-hundred-sixty-dollar ($360) fee shall be paid to the program provider upon intake of a consumer into a supported employment program. No fee shall be paid if that consumer completed a supported employment intake process with that same supported employment program within the previous 12 months.

(2) A seven-hundred-twenty-dollar ($720) fee shall be paid upon placement of a consumer in an integrated job, except that no fee shall be paid if that consumer is placed with another consumer or
 consumers assigned to the same job coach during the same hours of employment.

(3) A seven-hundred-twenty-dollar ($720) fee shall be paid after a 90-day retention of a consumer in a job, except that no fee shall be paid if that consumer has been placed with another consumer or consumers, assigned to the same job coach during the same hours of employment.

(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, the regional center shall pay the supported employment program rates established by this section.

(e) The department, with regional center participation, shall conduct an annual survey of providers, in a format determined by the department, to collect the following information:

(1) The number of employment placements in the previous 12 months.

(2) Types of employment in which consumers are placed.

(3) The cost components of the rates in subdivisions (a) and (b), including, but not limited to, the amount used for hourly wages of job coaches, administration, and placement search costs.

(4) The number of hours each consumer works and the consumer’s hourly wage.

(5) Any other information determined by the department.

(f) In its 2017–18 May Revision fiscal estimate, the department shall describe the results of the survey described in subdivision (e).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 12, Sec. 13.   (AB 143)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4861.

A regional center may vendor a new work activity or supported employment program after determining the capacity of the program to deliver effective
 services and meet the requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 4856.

(a) Programs that receive the regional center’s approval to provide supported employment services shall receive rates in accordance with Section 4860.

(b) A new work activity program shall receive the rate posted on the department’s internet website.

(c) The regional center may approve or disapprove proposals submitted by new or existing vendors based on all of the following criteria, to the extent that it is federally permissible:

(1) The need for a work activity or supported employment program.

(2) The capacity of the vendor to deliver work activity or supported employment services effectively.

(3) The ability of the vendor to comply with the requirements of this
 section and Section 4856.

(4) The ability of the vendor to achieve integrated paid work for individuals served in supported employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 45.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4862.

(a) The length of a work activity program day shall not be less than five hours, excluding the lunch period.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the length of a work activity program day shall not be reduced from the length of the work activity program day in the historical period that was the basis for the approved habilitation services rate.

(2) (A) A work activity program may, upon consultation with, and prior written approval from, the regional center, change the length of a work activity program day.

(B) If the regional center approves a reduction in the work activity program day pursuant to subparagraph (A), the department may change the work activity program rate.

(c) (1) A work activity program may change the length of a work activity program day for a specific consumer in order to meet the needs of that consumer, if the regional center, upon the recommendation of the individual program planning team, approves the change.

(2) The work activity program shall specify in writing to the regional center the reasons for any proposed change in a work
 activity program day on an individual basis.

(History: Amended (as being added July 1, 2004, by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 886, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

4863.

(a) In accordance with regulations adopted by the department, and if agreed upon by the work activity program and the regional center, hourly billing shall be permitted, provided that it does not increase the regional center’s costs when used in lieu of full-day billing. A work activity program shall be required to submit a request for the hourly billing option to the regional center not less than 60 days prior to the program’s proposed implementation of this billing option.

(b) If a work activity program and the regional center elect to utilize hourly billing, the hourly billing process shall be required to be used for a minimum of one year.

(c) When the hourly
 billing process is being used, the definitions contained in subdivisions (h) and (i) of Section 4851 shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 80.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4864.

The department shall authorize payment for absences in work activity programs and supported employment programs that are directly consequent to a declaration of a State of Emergency by the Governor. If the department authorizes payment for absences due to a state of emergency, the vendor shall bill only for absences in excess of the average number of absences experienced by the vendor during the 12-month period prior to the month in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4865.

At the request of the Department of Rehabilitation, a work activity or supported employment program, or both, shall release state licensing reports and individual special incident
 reports, as required by law or
 regulations, in instances of suspected abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 46.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4865.1.

(a) A regional center shall continue to pay the rate in effect as of June 30, 2004, for a supported employment placement group composed of a coach-to-client ratio of 1:3 when the provider submits to the State Department of Developmental Services and the regional center, by July 30, 2004, documentation that all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The group was established prior to July 1, 2002.

(2) The group was
 at the 1:3 ratio on May 1, 2004.

(3) The employer will only accommodate a group of three.

(b) In consultation with the regional center, the State Department of Developmental Services shall determine whether the requirements of this section have been met. The department’s decision shall be final.

(c) Groups paid under this section shall meet the requirements of subdivision (r) of Section 4851 by July 1, 2005, or be subject to termination of funding pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4860.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 9.4.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4866.

The department may promulgate emergency regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter. If the Department of Developmental Services promulgates emergency regulations, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

4867.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to mean that work activity programs or supported employment programs cannot serve consumers who are funded by agencies other than regional centers, including, but not limited to, the Department of Rehabilitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Employment [4868. - 4870.2.]

4868.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Competitive employment” means work in the competitive labor market that is performed on a full-time or part-time basis in an integrated setting and for which an individual is compensated at or above the minimum wage, but not less than the customary wage and level of benefits paid by the employer for the same or similar work performed by individuals who are not disabled.

(b) “Integrated employment” means “integrated work,” as defined in Section 4851.

(c) “Microenterprises” means small businesses owned by individuals with developmental disabilities who have control and
 responsibility for decisionmaking and overseeing the business, with accompanying business licenses, taxpayer identification numbers other than social security numbers, and separate business bank accounts. Microenterprises may be considered integrated competitive employment.

(d) “Self-employment” means an employment setting in which an individual works in a chosen occupation, for profit or fee, in the individual’s own small business, with control and responsibility for decisions affecting the conduct of the business.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 26) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 27.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4868.5.

(a) There is in the California Health and Human Services Agency the Office of Employment First.

(b) The office’s mission is to coordinate the Employment First Policy, as described in Section 4869, in order to reduce redundancy, ensure coordination of all employment support services across all agencies and departments, avoid fragmentation of services, guide strategic planning, and promote racial equity toward employment for individuals with developmental disabilities.

(c) The office shall have all of the following responsibilities:

(1) Identify and disseminate best practices.

(2) Develop effective strategies for partnerships with entities, including, but not limited to, employers, foundations, advocates, and other entities committed to creating integrated community employment opportunities.

(3) Provide technical assistance, as requested, to develop and implement strategies for equity in employment.

(4) Make recommendations for legislative, regulatory, and policy changes consistent with the Employment First Policy, as described in Section 4869.

(d) The office shall be under the control of an executive officer known as the Chief Employment First Officer who has the authority to do all of the following:

(1) Establish or improve reporting mechanisms to measure the
 success of employment programs for individuals with developmental disabilities and drive quality improvement.

(2) Monitor progress on employment for individuals with developmental disabilities, including, but not limited to, preparing monitoring instruments and issuing reports.

(3) Link data collection systems across state government entities through the development of a unique identification system.

(4) Track, analyze, and publicize service code utilization and vocational outcomes across the system.

(e) (1) The office shall form a standing Employment First Committee consisting of all of the following members:

(A) At least one designee of each of the members of the
 State Council on Developmental Disabilities specified in subparagraphs (B), (C), (D), (F), and (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 4521.

(B) A member of the consumer advisory committee of the state council.

(2) The responsibilities of the committee shall include, but need not be limited to, identifying ways services can be coordinated by state and local agencies to avoid disconnection of services and to improve accessibility of services.

(f) On or before June 30, 2025, and annually thereafter, the office shall provide a report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature and to the Governor describing its work and recommendations made pursuant to this section.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 28.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4868.6.
